Utah statutes.
16-10a-126.   Appeal from division's refusal to file document.

(1)  If the division refuses to file a document delivered to it for filing, the domestic or foreign corporation for which the filing was requested, or its representative, within 30 days after the effective date of the notice of refusal given by the division pursuant to Subsection 16-10a-125(3), may appeal the refusal to the district court of the county where the corporation's principal office is or will be located, or if there is none in this state, the county where its registered office is or will be located.  The appeal is commenced by petitioning the court to compel the filing of the document and by attaching to the petition a copy of the document and the division's notice of refusal.

(2)  The court may summarily order the division to file the document or take other action the court considers appropriate.

(3)  The court's final decision may be appealed as in any other civil proceedings.

